North Dakota, session 69, HB1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 1-01-49 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
1-01-49. Other general definitions.
As used in this code, unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise defined:
1. "Children" includes children by birth and by adoption.
2. "Coal" means all kinds of coal and includes what is known as lignite coal.
3. "Compound interest" means interest added to the principal as the interest becomes due and
which thereafter bears interest.
4. "Corporate surety" means a corporation or limited liability company duly authorized under the
laws of this state to transact a surety business in the state.
5. "Decree" has the same meaning as the word "judgment".
6. "Depose" includes every mode of written statement under oath or affirmation.
2.7. "Executor" includes administrator and "administrator" includes executor.
3.8. "Female" means a girl, woman, or an individual whose biological reproductive system is
developed to produce ova.
4.9. "Good faith" means an honest intention to abstain from taking any unconscientious advantage
of another even through the forms or technicalities of law, together with an absence of all
information or belief of facts which would render the transaction unconscientious.
10. "Individual" means a human being.
5.11. "Male" means a boy, man, or an individual whose biological reproductive system is developed
to produce sperm.
6.12. "Oath" includes "affirmation".

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 2
7.13. "Organization" includes a foreign or domestic association, business trust, corporation,
enterprise, estate, joint venture, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited
partnership, partnership, trust, or any legal or commercial entity.
8.14. "Paper" means any flexible material upon which it is usual to write.
15. "Partnership" includes a limited liability partnership registered under chapter 45-22.
9.16. "Penitentiary" includes any affiliated facilities.
10.17. "Person" means an individual, organization, government, political subdivision, or government
agency or instrumentality. The term does not include environmental elements, artificial
intelligence, an animal, or an inanimate object.
11.18. "Personal property" includes money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt.
12.19. "Population" means the number of inhabitants as determined by the last preceding state or
federal census.
20. "Preceding" and "following" when used by way of reference to a chapter or other part of a
statute means the next preceding or next following chapter or other part.
13.21. "Primary sector business" means an individual, corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or association certified by the department of commerce division of economic
development and finance which through the employment of knowledge or labor adds value to
a product, process, or service which results in the creation of new wealth.
For purposes of this subsection, "new wealth" means revenues generated by a business in
this state through the sale of products or services to:
a. Customers outside of this state; or
b. Customers in this state if the products or services were previously unavailable or difficult
to obtain from a business in this state.
14.22. "Process" means a writ or summons issued in the course of judicial proceedings.
15.23. "Property" includes property, real and personal.
16.24. "Qualified elector", as used in this code concerning qualifications for signing petitions to
governmental bodies, means a citizen of the United States who is eighteen years of age or
older; and is a resident of this state and of the area affected by the petition.
25. "Real property" shall be coextensive with lands, tenements, and hereditaments.
17.26. "Rule" includes regulation.
18.27. "Several" in relation to number means two or more.
28. "Sex" means the biological state of being male or female, based on the individual's
nonambiguous sex organs, chromosomes, or endogenous hormone profiles at birth.
19.29. "Signature" or "subscription" includes "mark" when the personindividual cannot write, the
person'sindividual's name being written near it and written by a personanother individual who
writes that person'sthe individual's own name as a witness.
20.30. "State" when applied to the different parts of the United States, includes the District of
Columbia and the territories.
21.31. "Testify" includes every mode of oral statement under oath or affirmation.

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 3
22.32. "Third persons" includes all who are not parties to the obligation or transaction concerning
which the phrase is used.
33. "United States" includes the District of Columbia and the territories.
23.34. "Value" or "valuable consideration" means something of value parted with, or a new obligation
assumed at the time of obtaining something, which serves as substantial compensation for
what is received in return.
35. "Verdict" includes not only the verdict of a jury, but also the finding upon the facts of a judge or
of a master appointed to determine the issues in a cause.
36. "Verified" means sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths.
37. "Will" includes codicils.
24.38. "Writ" means an order or precept in writing, issued in the name of the state or of a court or
judicial officer.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 12.1-32-15 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
g. "Sexual offender" means a person who has pled guilty to or been found guilty, including
juvenile delinquent adjudications, of a violation of section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1,
12.1-20-04, 12.1-20-05, 12.1-20-05.1, 12.1-20-06, 12.1-20-06.1, 12.1-20-07 except for
subdivision a of subsection 1, 12.1-20-11, 12.1-20-12.1, 12.1-20-12.2, 12.1-20-12.3
except for subdivision a of subsection 1 and subdivision b of subsection 1 if the offense
involves only a demand for money, chapter 12.1-27.2, subsection 2 of section
12.1-22-03.1, subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 12.1-41-02, section 12.1-41-04,
12.1-41-05, or 12.1-41-06, or an equivalent offense from another court in the United
States, a tribal court, or court of another country, or an attempt or conspiracy to commit
these offenses.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 14-07.6-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
b. The filing party has been found by a court to have committed an act of domestic violence
or disorderly conduct against the opposing party pursuant to a court order entered under
chapter 14-07.1, 14-09, or 12.1-32.2 12.1 - 31.2 , or an equivalent ordinance from another
state, provided the issuing court made a specific finding of domestic violence or
disorderly conduct, or the filing party has a prior conviction relating to domestic violence
against the opposing party under chapter 12.1-17;
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 18-01-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
18-01-36. Petroleum tank release compensation fund fees.
The insurance commissioner shall charge and collect fees for services provided by the state fire
marshal program to entities covered by the petroleum tank release compensation fund under chapter
23-37 23.1 - 12 . All fees collected under this section must be deposited in the insurance regulatory trust
fund.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subdivision j of subsection 4 of section 27-20.3-16 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
j. That permanency hearing must be as set forth in section 27-20.3-36 27 - 20.3 - 26 ; and

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 4
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 19 of section 45-13-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
19. "Partnership" means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a
business for profit formed under section 45-14-02, predecessor law, or comparable law of
another jurisdiction.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subsection 7 of section 49-02-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
7. Cooperate with and receive technical and financial assistance from the United States, any
state, or any department, agency, or officer thereof for any purposes relating to federal energy
laws that deal with energy conservation, coal conversion, rate reform, and utilities subject to
the jurisdiction of the commission. The commission shall also have the authority to file any
reports, hold hearings, and promulgate regulations for any such purposes. Information
received by the commission which was developed or obtained by a regional transmission
organization market monitor, the organization of midwestmidcontinent independent system
operator states, and the southwest power pool regional state committee is exempt from
section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 52-02-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
52-02-18. Independent performance audit.
The state auditor, upon request of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee, shall cause a
performance audit of job service North Dakota to be conducted within twelve months after receipt of the
request. The state auditor may appoint an independent audit firm, with extensive expertise in job
service practices and standards, to complete a performance audit or the state auditor may conduct the
performance audit. If the state auditor completes the audit, the state auditor may contract with a
consulting firm to aid in the state audit or to complete the audit and shall charge job service North
Dakota for the audit, including the services of the consulting firm. The executive director of job service
North Dakota and the auditor shall present the audit report and any action taken as a result of the audit
to the legislative audit and fiscal review committee and to the house and senate industry, business and
labor standing committeescommittee and the senate industry and business standing committee during
the next regular session of the legislative assembly following the audit.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 54-10-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
5. Present results of information technology compliance reviews to the information technology
committee and the state information technology advisory committee.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.6-02.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-52.6-02.2. Election after December 31, 2024 - Additional employer contribution. (Effective
after December 31, 2024)
1. As used in this section, "eligible employee" means a permanent state employee who on
December 31, 2024, is a participating member of the public employees retirement system
main system plan under chapter 54-42 54 - 52 , who has been a participating member under
chapter 54-52 for no more than five years, and who is at least eighteen years of age.
2. The board shall provide a three-month election period, from January 1, 2025, through March
31, 2025, for an eligible employee to transfer to the defined contribution plan under this
chapter pursuant to the rules and policies adopted by the board.

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 5
a. An election under this section made by a member of the public employees retirement
system under chapter 54-52 to transfer to the defined contribution retirement plan under
this chapter is irrevocable.
b. For an eligible employee who elects to transfer from the public employees retirement
system under chapter 54-52 to the defined contribution retirement plan under this
chapter, the board shall transfer a lump sum amount from the public employees
retirement system fund to the member's account in the defined contribution retirement
plan under this chapter. However, if the eligible employee terminates employment before
receiving the lump sum transfer under this section, the election made is ineffective and
the eligible employee remains a member of the public employees retirement system
under chapter 54-52 and retains all the rights and privileges under that chapter.
c. The board shall calculate the lump sum amount to be transferred based on the actuarial
present value of the eligible employee's accumulated benefit obligation under the public
employees retirement system based on the assumption the eligible employee will retire
under the earlier applicable normal retirement age, plus interest from January 1, 2025, to
the date of transfer, at the rate of one-half of one percent less than the actuarial interest
assumption at the time of the election.
d. This section does not affect an eligible individual's right to health benefits under chapter
54-52.1.
3. The state employer of an eligible employee who elects under this section to participate in the
defined contribution retirement plan under this chapter shall pay an additional annual
contribution of three thousand three hundred and thirty-three dollars for up to three years.
Under this subsection, the employer shall pay the additional contribution each year the eligible
employee continues permanent employment with the state, beginning January 2026, and
extending no further than January 2028.
4. If the board receives notification from the internal revenue service that this section or any
portion of this section will cause the public employees retirement system or the retirement plan
established under this chapter to be disqualified for tax purposes under the Internal Revenue
Code, that portion that will cause the disqualification does not apply.
Election after the day before the effective date of this Act - Additional employer contribution.
(Effective on the date identified if the contingency is satisfied) (Contingent effective date - See
note)
1. As used in this section, "eligible employee" means a permanent state employee who on the
day before the effective date of this Act, is a participating member of the public employees
retirement system main system plan under chapter 54-42 54 - 52 , who has been a participating
member under chapter 54-52 for no more than five years, and who is at least eighteen years
of age.
2. The board shall provide a three-month election period, beginning on the effective date of this
Act, for an eligible employee to transfer to the defined contribution plan under this chapter
pursuant to the rules and policies adopted by the board.
a. An election under this section made by a member of the public employees retirement
system under chapter 54-52 to transfer to the defined contribution retirement plan under
this chapter is irrevocable.
b. For an eligible employee who elects to transfer from the public employees retirement
system under chapter 54-52 to the defined contribution retirement plan under this
chapter, the board shall transfer a lump sum amount from the public employees
retirement system fund to the member's account in the defined contribution retirement
plan under this chapter. However, if the eligible employee terminates employment before

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 6
receiving the lump sum transfer under this section, the election made is ineffective and
the eligible employee remains a member of the public employees retirement system
under chapter 54-52 and retains all the rights and privileges under that chapter.
c. The board shall calculate the lump sum amount to be transferred based on the actuarial
present value of the eligible employee's accumulated benefit obligation under the public
employees retirement system based on the assumption the eligible employee will retire
under the earlier applicable normal retirement age, plus interest from the effective date of
this Act, to the date of transfer, at the rate of one-half of one percent less than the
actuarial interest assumption at the time of the election.
d. This section does not affect an eligible individual's right to health benefits under chapter
54-52.1.
3. The state employer of an eligible employee who elects under this section to participate in the
defined contribution retirement plan under this chapter shall pay an additional annual
contribution of three thousand three hundred and thirty-three dollars for up to three years.
Under this subsection, the employer shall pay the additional contribution each year the eligible
employee continues permanent employment with the state, beginning one year after the
effective date of this Act, and extending no further than three years following the effective date
of this Act.
4. If the board receives notification from the internal revenue service that this section or any
portion of this section will cause the public employees retirement system or the retirement plan
established under this chapter to be disqualified for tax purposes under the Internal Revenue
Code, that portion that will cause the disqualification does not apply.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 57-02-08.8 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. A disabled veteran or unremarried surviving spouse claiming a credit under this section for the
first time shall file with the county auditor an affidavit showing the facts required under this
section, a description of the property, and a certificate from the United States department of
veterans' affairs, or its successor, certifying to the amount of the disability. The affidavit and
certificate must be open for public inspection. A person shall thereafter furnish to the assessor
or other assessment officials, when requested to do so, any information which supports the
claim for credit for any subsequent year.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 57-38-30.3 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. For purposes of this section, "North Dakota taxable income" means the federal taxable income
of an individual, estate, or trust as computed under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, adjusted as follows:
a. Reduced by interest income from obligations of the United States and income exempt
from state income tax under federal statute or United States or North Dakota
constitutional provisions.
b. Reduced by the portion of a distribution from a qualified investment fund described in
section 57-38-01 which is attributable to investments by the qualified investment fund in
obligations of the United States, obligations of North Dakota or its political subdivisions,
and any other obligation the interest from which is exempt from state income tax under
federal statute or United States or North Dakota constitutional provisions.
c. Reduced by the amount equal to the earnings that are passed through to a taxpayer in
connection with an allocation and apportionment to North Dakota under section
57-38-01.35.

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 7
d. Reduced by forty percent of:
(1) The excess of the taxpayer's net long-term capital gain for the taxable year over the
net short-term capital loss for that year, as computed for purposes of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The adjustment provided by this subdivision
is allowed only to the extent the net long-term capital gain is allocated to this state.
(2) Qualified dividends as defined under Internal Revenue Code section 1(h)(11),
added by section 302(a) of the Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of
2003 [Pub. L. 108-27; 117 Stat. 752; 2 U.S.C. 963 et seq.], but only if taxed at a
federal income tax rate that is lower than the regular federal income tax rates
applicable to ordinary income. If, for any taxable year, qualified dividends are taxed
at the regular federal income tax rates applicable to ordinary income, the reduction
allowed under this subdivision is equal to thirty percent of all dividends included in
federal taxable income. The adjustment provided by this subdivision is allowed only
to the extent the qualified dividend income is allocated to this state.
e. Increased by the amount of a lump sum distribution for which income averaging was
elected under section 402 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. 402], as
amended. This adjustment does not apply if the taxpayer received the lump sum
distribution while a nonresident of this state and the distribution is exempt from taxation
by this state under federal law.
f. Increased by an amount equal to the losses that are passed through to a taxpayer in
connection with an allocation and apportionment to North Dakota under section
57-38-01.35.
g. Reduced by the amount of military pay received by a taxpayer as a member of the armed
forces of the United States on federal active duty, member of the national guard or
reserve member of the armed forces of the United States, to the extent that military pay
is included in North Dakota taxable income of the taxpayer. For purposes of this
subdivision, "military pay" includes all federal pay for training, education, mobilization,
and bonuses and state pay when called to support an emergency on state active duty.
h. Reduced by income from a new and expanding business exempt from state income tax
under section 40-57.1-04.
i. Reduced by interest and income from bonds issued under chapter 11-37.
j. Reduced by up to ten thousand dollars of qualified expenses that are related to a
donation by a taxpayer or a taxpayer's dependent, while living, of one or more human
organs to another human being for human organ transplantation. A taxpayer may claim
the reduction in this subdivision only once for each instance of organ donation during the
taxable year in which the human organ donation and the human organ transplantation
occurs but if qualified expenses are incurred in more than one taxable year, the reduction
for those expenses must be claimed in the year in which the expenses are incurred. For
purposes of this subdivision:
(1) "Human organ transplantation" means the medical procedure by which transfer of a
human organ is made from the body of one person to the body of another person.
(2) "Organ" means all or part of an individual's liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, lung, or
bone marrow.
(3) "Qualified expenses" means lost wages not compensated by sick pay and
unreimbursed medical expenses as defined for federal income tax purposes, to the
extent not deducted in computing federal taxable income, whether or not the
taxpayer itemizes federal income tax deductions.

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 8
k.j. Increased by the amount of the contribution upon which the credit under section
57-38-01.21 is computed, but only to the extent that the contribution reduced federal
taxable income.
l.k. Reduced by the amount of any payment received by a veteran or beneficiary of a veteran
under section 37-28-03 or 37-28-04.
m.l. Reduced by the amount received by a taxpayer that was paid by an employer under
paragraph 4 of subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 57-38-01.25 to hire the taxpayer
for a hard-to-fill position under section 57-38-01.25, but only to the extent the amount
received by the taxpayer is included in federal taxable income. The reduction applies only
if the employer is entitled to the credit under section 57-38-01.25. The taxpayer must
attach a statement from the employer in which the employer certifies that the employer is
entitled to the credit under section 57-38-01.25 and which specifically identified the type
of payment and the amount of the exemption under this section.
n.m. Reduced by the amount up to a maximum of five thousand dollars, or ten thousand
dollars if a joint return is filed, for contributions made under a higher education savings
plan administered by the Bank of North Dakota, pursuant to section 6-09-38.
o.n. Reduced by the amount of income of a taxpayer, who resides anywhere within the
exterior boundaries of a reservation situated in this state or situated both in this state and
in an adjoining state and who is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian
tribe, from activities or sources anywhere within the exterior boundaries of a reservation
situated in this state or both situated in this state and in an adjoining state.
p.o. For married individuals filing jointly, reduced by an amount equal to the excess of the
recomputed itemized deductions or standard deduction over the amount of the itemized
deductions or standard deduction deducted in computing federal taxable income. For
purposes of this subdivision, "itemized deductions or standard deduction" means the
amount under section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code that the married individuals
deducted in computing their federal taxable income and "recomputed itemized
deductions or standard deduction" means an amount determined by computing the
itemized deductions or standard deduction in a manner that replaces the basic standard
deduction under section 63(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code for married individuals
filing jointly with an amount equal to double the amount of the basic standard deduction
under section 63(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code for a single individual other than a
head of household and surviving spouse. If the married individuals elected under
section 63(e) of the Internal Revenue Code to deduct itemized deductions in computing
their federal taxable income even though the amount of the allowable standard deduction
is greater, the reduction under this subdivision is not allowed. Married individuals filing
jointly shall compute the available reduction under this subdivision in a manner
prescribed by the tax commissioner.
q.p. Reduced by an amount equal to four thousand one hundred fifty dollars for taxable year
2018, for each birth resulting in stillbirth, as defined in section 23-02.1-01, for which a
fetal death certificate has been filed under section 23-02.1-20. For taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2018, the deduction amount must be adjusted annually on
January first of each year by the cost-of-living adjustment. For purposes of this
subdivision, "cost-of-living adjustment" means the percentage increase in the consumer
price index for all urban consumers in the midwest region as determined by the United
States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the most recent year ending
December thirty-first. The exemption may only be claimed in the taxable year in which
the stillbirth occurred.
r.q. Reduced by the amount of expenses incurred by an employee which are directly related
to the attainment of higher education or career and technical education which are

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 9
reimbursed by the employee's employer, but only to the extent the amount of
reimbursement is reported as federal taxable income.
s.r. Reduced by the amount received by a taxpayer as retired military personnel benefits,
including retired military personnel benefits paid to the surviving spouse of a deceased
retired member of the armed forces of the United States, a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States, or the national guard, but only to the extent the
amount was included in federal taxable income.
t.s. Reduced by the amount of social security benefits included in a taxpayer's federal
adjusted gross income under section 86 of the Internal Revenue Code.
u.t. Reduced by the amount of retired law enforcement personnel benefits received by a
taxpayer who has served a combined total of at least twenty years as a peace officer or
has medically retired from the taxpayer's duties as a peace officer with a medical
certificate due to a permanent mental or physical disability that rendered the taxpayer
unable to discharge the taxpayer's duties as a peace officer, but only to the extent the
amount was included in federal taxable income. For purposes of this subdivision:
(1) "Peace officer" means a public servant authorized by law or by a government
agency or branch of the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state to
enforce the law and to conduct or engage in investigations of violations of the law.
(2) "Retired law enforcement personnel benefits" means retirement income received by
a taxpayer eligible to receive retirement income attributable to the taxpayer's
employment as a peace officer from a retirement plan maintained by or through the
employer from which the taxpayer retired as a peace officer.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-40.5-03 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Aircraft acquired by disabled veterans as defined by the provisions of Public Law No. 79-663
[38 U.S.C. 19013901]. This exemption shall be allowed only with respect to one aircraft owned
by any disabled veteran.
SECTION 14. REPEAL. Sections 1-01-18, 1-01-20, 1-01-21, 1-01-27, 1-01-29, 1-01-30, 1-01-36,
1-01-40, 1-01-41, 1-01-42, 1-01-45, 1-01-46, 1-01-47, and 1-01-51 of the North Dakota Century Code
are repealed.
SECTION 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 11 and 12 of this Act are effective for taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2024.

H. B. NO. 1031 - PAGE 10
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1031.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State